Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-311 Penalties. In addition to
any other applicable penalties for violations of this chapter, pursuant to
section 431:2-203, the commissioner may require issuers violating any provision
of this part or rules adopted pursuant to this part to cease marketing or
selling any medicare supplement policy in this State which is related directly
or indirectly to a violation or may require the issuer to take actions
necessary to comply with the provisions of this part, or both. [L 1989, c 195,
§4; am L 1992, c 195, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next